Hawaii statutes.
B. Reports

§414-472 Annual report. (a) Each
domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this State, shall deliver to the department director for filing an
annual report that sets forth:

(1) The name of the corporation and the state or
country under whose law it is incorporated;

(2) The mailing address of its principal office and
the information required by section 425R-4(a);

(3) The names and business addresses of its directors
and officers; and

(4) A brief description of the nature of its
business.

Domestic corporations shall also provide the total
number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series, if any, within each
class, and the total number of issued and outstanding shares, itemized by class
and series, if any, within each class.

(b) The annual report shall be filed within
the time periods prescribed in subsections (c) and (d).

(c) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of
this chapter to the contrary, annual reports reflecting the period from January
1, 2002, through December 31, 2002, that would otherwise be required, may be
voluntarily filed with the department director if the annual report complies
with the requirements of this section.

(d) Effective January 1, 2003, for a domestic
or foreign corporation whose date of incorporation or registration in this
State falls between:

(1) January 1 and March 31, an annual report shall be
filed on or before March 31 of each year and shall reflect the state of the
corporation's affairs as of January 1 of the year when filed;

(2) April 1 and June 30, an annual report shall be
filed on or before June 30 of each year and shall reflect the state of the
corporation's affairs as of April 1 of the year when filed;

(3) July 1 and September 30, an annual report shall
be filed on or before September 30 of each year and shall reflect the state of
the corporation's affairs as of July 1 of the year when filed; and

(4) October 1 and December 31, an annual report shall
be filed on or before December 31 of each year and shall reflect the state of
the corporation's affairs as of October 1 of the year when filed;

provided that if a domestic or foreign corporation
is incorporated or registered in the same year in which the annual report is
due, the domestic or foreign corporation shall not be required to file an
annual report for that year. Thereafter, the domestic or foreign corporation
shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) If an annual report does not contain the
information required by this section, the department director shall promptly
notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the
report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the
information required by this section and delivered to the department director
within thirty days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be
timely filed. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §50; am L 2002, c
130, §36; am L 2003, c 124, §18; am L 2009, c 55, §16]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next